Connecticut, session 2026, HB05251.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Consultant" means any person who (A) (i) is a professional who
3 is registered or licensed to practice such profession in accordance with
4 the applicable provisions of the general statutes, or (ii) is a planner or an
5 environmental, management or financial specialist, and (B) provides
6 consultant services to a state agency pursuant to a contract with such
7 state agency, including, but not limited to, any architect, professional
8 engineer, accountant, planner or environmental, management or
9 financial specialist;
10 (2) "Consultant services" includes administrative, planning, analysis,
11 statistical or research services rendered by any consultant, as well as
12 incidental services that members of such consultant's profession and
13 those in their employ are authorized to perform, for purposes of
14 recommending a state agency course of action;
sHB5251 / File No. 317 1

sHB5251 File No. 317
15 (3) "Firm" means any individual, partnership, corporation, joint
16 venture, association or other legal entity authorized by law to offer
17 consultant services; and
18 (4) "State agency" means any office, department, board, council,
19 commission, institution, constituent unit of the state system of higher
20 education, technical education and career school or other agency in the
21 executive branch of state government.
22 (b) Any state agency that contracts with a firm to provide consultant
23 services at a cost of one hundred thousand dollars or more for purposes
24 of producing a study or other report with recommendations for future
25 actions for the state agency to undertake that is required to be
26 transmitted to a joint standing committee of the General Assembly
27 pursuant to the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes shall,
28 not later than one year after receipt of the results of such study or a final
29 report from such firm, also submit a report, in accordance with the
30 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
31 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
32 relating to government oversight, (1) summarizing the findings of the
33 entity's report, (2) indicating whether any recommendations have been
34 implemented by the agency, and (3) indicating whether the state agency
35 intends to implement any such recommendations in the future and, if
36 applicable, by what date.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Subsecs. (a)(1) and (2) were reworded to avoid duplication and for
clarity, and in Subsec. (b), "joint standing" was added before
"committee" for accuracy and Subdiv. designators (1) to (3) were added
for clarity.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5251 / File No. 317 2

sHB5251 File No. 317
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various State Agencies Various - See Below See Below
Potential Cost
Note: Various=Various
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires any state agency that contracts for consultant
services that (1) are valued at least $100,000 and (2) provide
recommendations to submit a report to the legislative Government
Oversight Committee regarding implementation of the
recommendations, resulting in a potential cost to various state agencies
beginning in FY 27.
There is a potential cost to various state agencies1 beginning in FY 27,
to the extent that additional administrative burden will be created for
agencies that rely heavily on contracting, and a potential additional cost
to the extent that current contracts impacted by the bill would need to
be amended.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
1 Potentially impacted agencies include the Department of Administrative Services
(DAS), State Department of Education (DOE), Department of Economic and
Community Development (DECD), Office of Early Childhood (OEC), Office of Policy
and Management (OPM), and Department of Social Services (DSS), among others.
sHB5251 / File No. 317 3

sHB5251 File No. 317
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5251
AN ACT CONCERNING REPORTING ON IMPLEMENTATION OF
CERTAIN CONSULTANT REPORT RECOMMENDATIONS.